District of Columbia statutes.
5-117.05

False or fictitious reports to Metropolitan Police.

Except as provided in § 22-1319, whoever shall make or cause to be made to the Metropolitan Police force of the District of Columbia, or to any officer or member thereof, a false or fictitious report of the commission of any criminal offense within the District of Columbia, or a false or fictitious report of any other matter or occurrence of which such Metropolitan Police force is required to receive reports, or in connection with which such Metropolitan Police force is required to conduct an investigation, knowing such report to be false or fictitious; or who shall communicate or cause to be communicated to such Metropolitan Police force, or any officer or member thereof, any false information concerning the commission of any criminal offense within the District of Columbia or concerning any other matter or occurrence of which such Metropolitan Police force is required to receive reports, or in connection with which such Metropolitan Police force is required to conduct an investigation, knowing such information to be false, shall be punished by a fine of not exceeding $300 or by imprisonment not exceeding 30 days.

History

Dec. 27, 1967, 81 Stat. 739, Pub. L. 90-226, title VI, § 608
Oct. 17, 2002, D.C. Law 14-194, § 152, 49 DCR 5306

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 4-151.
1973 Ed., § 4-150a.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 14-194 substituted “Except as provided in § 22-1319, whoever” for “Whoever”.